Hawaii, session 2025, HB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 346-59.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.   By amending subsection (b) to read: "(b)  Reimbursement for services provided through telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient[; provided that reimbursement for the diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment of a mental health disorder delivered through an interactive telecommunications system using two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology shall meet the requirements of title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section 410.78. Nothing in this section shall require a health care provider to be physically present with the patient at an originating site unless a health care provider at the distant site deems it necessary]." 2.   By amending subsection (g) to read: "(g)  For the purposes of this section: "Distant site" means the location of the health care provider delivering services through telehealth at the time the services are provided. "Health care provider" means a provider of services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(u), a provider of medical and other health services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other practitioners licensed by the State and working within their scope of practice, and any other person or organization who furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal course of business, including but not limited to primary care providers, mental health providers, oral health providers, physicians and osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465, and dentists licensed under chapter 448. "Interactive telecommunications system" [has the same meaning as the term is defined in title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section 410.78(a).] means multimedia communications equipment that includes, at a minimum, audio and video equipment permitting two-way, real-time interactive telecommunications between the patient and distant site physician or practitioner.  "Interactive telecommunications system" may also include two‑way, real-time, audio-only communication technology for any telehealth service furnished to a patient in the patient's home if the distant site physician or practitioner is technically capable of using an interactive telecommunications system but the patient is not capable of, or does not consent to, the use of video technology; provided that verification of the patient's lack of video capability or consent shall be appended to any claim for telehealth services furnished using two-way, real‑time, audio-only communications technology. "Originating site" means the location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office, hospital, critical access hospital, rural health clinic, federally qualified health center, a patient's home, and other nonmedical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work location of a patient. "Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications services, as defined in section 269-1, to encompass four modalities:  store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant site.  Except as provided through an interactive telecommunications system, standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or alone, do not constitute telehealth services." SECTION 2.  Section 431:2-211, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§431:2-211  Annual report.  The commissioner, as early each year as accurate preparation enables, shall prepare and submit to the legislature a report [which] that shall contain: (1)  The condition of all insurers authorized to do business in this State during the preceding year[.]; (2)  A summary of abuses and deficiencies in benefit payments, the complaints made to the commissioner and their disposition, and the extent of compliance and noncompliance by each insurer with the provisions of this code[.]; (3)  A summary of the telehealth claims reimbursed during the preceding year, pursuant to Act     , Session Laws of Hawaii 2025; and [(3)  Such] (4) Any additional information and comments relative to insurance activities in this State [as] that the commissioner deems proper." SECTION 3.  Section 431:10A-116.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.   By amending subsection (c) to read: "(c)  Reimbursement for services provided through telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient; provided that [reimbursement for two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology for purposes of diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment of a mental health disorder to a patient in the patient's home shall be equivalent to eighty per cent of the reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient.  To] to be reimbursed for telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system using two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology in accordance with this subsection, the health care provider shall first conduct an in-person visit [or a telehealth visit that is not audio only,] within six months prior to the initial audio-only visit, or within twelve months prior to any subsequent audio-only visit.  [The telehealth visit required prior to the initial or subsequent audio-only visit in this subsection shall not be provided using audio-only communication.  Nothing in this section shall require a health care provider to be physically present with the patient at an originating site unless a health care provider at the distant site deems it necessary.]" 2.   By amending subsection (g) to read: "(g)  For the purposes of this section: "Distant site" means the location of the health care provider delivering services through telehealth at the time the services are provided. "Health care provider" means a provider of services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(u), a provider of medical and other health services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other practitioners licensed by the State and working within their scope of practice, and any other person or organization who furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal course of business, including but not limited to primary care providers, mental health providers, oral health providers, physicians and osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465, and dentists licensed under chapter 448. "Interactive telecommunications system" [has the same meaning as the term is defined in title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section 410.78(a).] means multimedia communications equipment that includes, at a minimum, audio and video equipment permitting two-way, real-time interactive telecommunications between the patient and distant site physician or practitioner.  "Interactive telecommunications system" may also include two‑way, real-time, audio-only communication technology for any telehealth service furnished to a patient in the patient's home if the distant site physician or practitioner is technically capable of using an interactive telecommunications system but the patient is not capable of, or does not consent to, the use of video technology; provided that verification of the patient's lack of video capability or consent shall be appended to any claim for telehealth services furnished using two-way, real‑time, audio-only communications technology. "Originating site" means the location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office, hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other nonmedical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work location of a patient. "Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications services, as defined in section 269-1, to encompass four modalities:  store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant site.  Except as provided through an interactive telecommunications system, standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or alone, do not constitute telehealth services." SECTION 4.  Section 432:1-601.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.   By amending subsection (c) to read: "(c)  Reimbursement for services provided through telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient; provided that [reimbursement for two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology for purposes of diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment of a mental health disorder to a patient in the patient's home shall be equivalent to eighty per cent of the reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient.  To] to be reimbursed for telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system using two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology in accordance with this subsection, the health care provider shall first conduct an in-person visit [or a telehealth visit that is not audio only,] within six months prior to the initial audio-only visit, or within twelve months prior to any subsequent audio-only visit.  [The telehealth visit required prior to the initial or subsequent audio-only visit in this subsection shall not be provided using audio-only communication.  Nothing in this section shall require a health care provider to be physically present with the patient at an originating site unless a health care provider at the distant site deems it necessary.]" 2.   By amending subsection (g) to read: "(g)  For the purposes of this section: "Health care provider" means a provider of services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(u), a provider of medical and other health services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other practitioners licensed by the State and working within their scope of practice, and any other person or organization who furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal course of business, including but not limited to primary care providers, mental health providers, oral health providers, physicians and osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465, and dentists licensed under chapter 448. "Interactive telecommunications system" [has the same meaning as the term is defined in title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section 410.78(a).] means multimedia communications equipment that includes, at a minimum, audio and video equipment permitting two‑way, real-time interactive telecommunications between the patient and distant site physician or practitioner.  "Interactive telecommunications system" may also include two‑way, real-time, audio-only communication technology for any telehealth service furnished to a patient in the patient's home if the distant site physician or practitioner is technically capable of using an interactive telecommunications system but the patient is not capable of, or does not consent to, the use of video technology; provided that verification of the patient's lack of video capability or consent shall be appended to any claim for telehealth services furnished using two-way, real‑time, audio-only communications technology. "Originating site" means the location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office, hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other nonmedical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work location of a patient. "Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications services, as defined in section 269-1, to encompass four modalities:  store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant site.  Except as provided through an interactive telecommunications system, standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or alone, do not constitute telehealth services." SECTION 5.  Section 432D-23.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.   By amending subsection (c) to read: "(c)  Reimbursement for services provided through telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient; provided that [reimbursement for two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology for purposes of diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment of a mental health disorder to a patient in the patient's home shall be equivalent to eighty per cent of the reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient.  To] to be reimbursed for telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system using two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology in accordance with this subsection, the health care provider shall first conduct an in-person visit [or a telehealth visit that is not audio only,] within six months prior to the initial audio-only visit, or within twelve months prior to any subsequent audio-only visit.  [The telehealth visit required prior to the initial or subsequent audio-only visit in this subsection shall not be provided using audio-only communication.  Nothing in this section shall require a health care provider to be physically present with the patient at an originating site unless a health care provider at the distant site deems it necessary.]" 2.   By amending subsection (g) to read: "(g)  For the purposes of this section: "Distant site" means the location of the health care provider delivering services through telehealth at the time the services are provided. "Health care provider" means a provider of services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(u), a provider of medical and other health services, as defined in title 42 United States Code section 1395x(s), other practitioners licensed by the State and working within their scope of practice, and any other person or organization who furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care in the normal course of business, including but not limited to primary care providers, mental health providers, oral health providers, physicians and osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 453, advanced practice registered nurses licensed under chapter 457, psychologists licensed under chapter 465, and dentists licensed under chapter 448. "Interactive telecommunications system" [has the same meaning as the term is defined in title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section 410.78(a).] means multimedia communications equipment that includes, at a minimum, audio and video equipment permitting two-way, real-time interactive telecommunications between the patient and distant site physician or practitioner.  "Interactive telecommunications system" may also include two‑way, real-time, audio-only communication technology for any telehealth service furnished to a patient in the patient's home if the distant site physician or practitioner is technically capable of using an interactive telecommunications system but the patient is not capable of, or does not consent to, the use of video technology; provided that verification of the patient's lack of video capability or consent shall be appended to any claim for telehealth services furnished using two-way, real‑time, audio-only communications technology. "Originating site" means the location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office, hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other nonmedical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work location of a patient. "Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications services, as defined in section 269-1, to encompass four modalities:  store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real‑time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant site.  Except as provided through an interactive telecommunications system, standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or alone, do not constitute telehealth services." SECTION 6.  Section 453-1.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.   By amending subsection (h) to read: "(h)  Unless otherwise provided by law, reimbursement for behavioral health services provided through telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system shall be equivalent to reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient; provided that [reimbursement for two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology for purposes of diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment of a mental health disorder to a patient in the patient's home shall be equivalent to eighty per cent of the reimbursement for the same services provided via in-person contact between a health care provider and a patient.  To] to be reimbursed for telehealth via an interactive telecommunications system using two-way, real-time audio-only communication technology in accordance with this subsection, the health care provider shall first conduct an in‑person visit [or a telehealth visit that is not audio only,] within six months prior to the initial audio-only visit, or within twelve months prior to any subsequent audio-only visit.  [The telehealth visit required prior to the initial or subsequent audio-only visit in this subsection shall not be provided using audio-only communication.]" 2.   By amending subsection (j) to read: "(j) For the purposes of this section: "Distant site" means the location of the physician delivering services through telehealth at the time the services are provided. "Interactive telecommunications system" [has the same meaning as the term is defined in title 42 Code of Federal Regulations section 410.78(a).] means multimedia communications equipment that includes, at a minimum, audio and video equipment permitting two‑way, real-time interactive telecommunications between the patient and distant site physician or practitioner.  "Interactive telecommunications system" may also include two‑way, real-time, audio-only communication technology for any telehealth service furnished to a patient in the patient's home if the distant site physician or practitioner is technically capable of using an interactive telecommunications system but the patient is not capable of, or does not consent to, the use of video technology; provided that verification of the patient's lack of video capability or consent shall be appended to any claim for telehealth services furnished using two-way, real‑time, audio-only communications technology. "Originating site" means the location where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care provider, at the time services are provided by a physician through telehealth, including but not limited to a physician's office, hospital, health care facility, a patient's home, and other non‑medical environments such as school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work location of a patient. "Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications as defined in section 269-1, to encompass four modalities:  store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non-interactive web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the purposes of:  delivering enhanced health care services and information while a patient is at an originating site and the physician is at a distant site; establishing a physician‑patient relationship; evaluating a patient; or treating a patient.  Except as provided through an interactive telecommunications system, standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in combination or alone, do not constitute telehealth services." SECTION 7.  Beginning with the regular session of 2026 and each regular session thereafter, the insurance commissioner's annual report to the legislature shall include the total number of claims reimbursed in the previous calendar year for: (1)  Telehealth services; (2)  Telehealth services related to mental health; (3)  Audio-only telehealth services related to mental health; (4)  Telehealth services not related to mental health; and (5)  Audio-only telehealth services not related to mental health. SECTION 8.  Act 107, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, is amended by amending section 8 to read as follows: "SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval[; provided that on December 31, 2025, this Act shall be repealed and sections 346-59.1, 431:10A-116.3, 432:1-601.5, 432D-23.5, and 453‑1.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which they read on the day prior to the effective date of this Act]." SECTION 9.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 10.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 11.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________